Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-248.02
Juvenile offender civil citation
pilot program; peace officer issue civil citation; contents; advisement; peace
officer; duties; juvenile report to juvenile assessment center; failure to
comply; effect.

A
juvenile offender civil citation pilot program as provided in this section
and section 43-248.03 may be undertaken by the peace officers and county and
city attorneys of a county containing a city of the metropolitan class. The
pilot program shall be according to the following procedures:

(1) A peace
officer, upon making contact with a juvenile whom the peace officer has reasonable
grounds to believe has committed a misdemeanor offense, other than an offense
involving a firearm, sexual assault, or domestic violence, may issue the juvenile
a civil citation;

(2) The civil
citation shall include: The juvenile's name, address, school of attendance,
and contact information; contact information for the juvenile's parents or
guardian; a description of the misdemeanor offense believed to have been committed;
the juvenile assessment center where the juvenile cited is to appear within
seventy-two hours after the issuance of the civil citation; and a warning
that failure to appear in accordance with the command of the civil citation
or failure to provide the information necessary for the peace officer to complete
the civil citation will result in the juvenile being taken into temporary
custody as provided in sections 43-248 and 43-250;

(3) At the time of issuance
of a civil citation by the peace officer, the peace officer shall advise the
juvenile that the juvenile has the option to refuse the civil citation and
be taken directly into temporary custody as provided in sections 43-248 and
43-250. The option to refuse the civil citation may be exercised at any time
prior to compliance with any services required pursuant to subdivision (5)
of this section;

(4) Upon issuing a civil citation, the peace officer shall provide
or send a copy of the civil citation to the appropriate county attorney, the
juvenile assessment center, and the parents or guardian of the juvenile;

(5) The juvenile
shall report to the juvenile assessment center as instructed by the citation.
The juvenile assessment center may require the juvenile to participate in
community service or other available services appropriate to the needs of
the juvenile identified by the juvenile assessment center which may include
family counseling, urinalysis monitoring, or substance abuse and mental health
treatment services; and

(6) If the juvenile fails to comply with any services required
pursuant to subdivision (5) of this section or if the juvenile is issued a
third or subsequent civil citation, a peace officer shall take the juvenile
into temporary custody as provided in sections 43-248 and 43-250.

Laws 2010, LB800, § 10.